Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1568.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116L.03, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Appointment. The Minnesota Job Skills Partnership Board consists of: seven members appointed by the governor, the commissioner of employment and economic developmentnew text begin or the commissioner's designeenew text end , the chancellor, or the chancellor's designee, of the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities, the president, or the president's designee, of the University of Minnesota, and two nonlegislator members, one appointed by the Subcommittee on Committees of the senate Committee on Rules and Administration and one appointed by the speaker of the house. If the chancellor or the president of the university makes a designation under this subdivision, the designee must have experience in technical education. Four of the appointed members must be members of the governor's Workforce Development Board, of whom two must represent organized labor and two must represent business and industry. One of the appointed members must be a representative of a nonprofit organization that provides workforce development or job training services. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116L.35, is amended to read: 116L.35 INVENTORY OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROGRAMS. (a) By January 15, 2020, and by January 15 of each even-numbered year thereafter, the commissioner of employment and economic development must submit a report to the chairs of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over economic development that provides an inventory of all economic development programs, including any workforce development programs, either provided by or overseen by any agency of the state of Minnesota. (b) Programs related to economic development that must be included in the report include those that: (1) receive federal funds or state funds; (2) provide assistance to either businesses or individuals; or (3) support internships, apprenticeships, career and technical education, or any form of employment training. (c) For each economic development program, the report must include, at a minimum, the following information: (1) details of program costs; (2) the number of staff, both within the department and any outside organization; (3) the number of program participants; (4) the demographic information including, but not limited to, race, age, gender, and income of program participants; (5) a list of any and all subgrantees receiving funds from the program, as well as the amount of funding received; (6) information about other sources of funding including other public or private funding or in-kind donations; (7) evidence that: (i) the organization administering a program; (ii) a business receiving a loan for a new or expanded business from a program; or (iii) a subgrantee of a program is in good standing with the Minnesota Secretary of State and the Minnesota Department of Revenue; (8) a short description of what each program does; and (9) to the extent practical, quantifiable measures of program success. (d) In addition to the information required under paragraph (c), a program related to economic development under paragraph (b) that requests an increase in state funding over the previous biennium must provide the following: (1) detailed information regarding the need for increased funds; and (2) the planned uses of the increased funds. new text begin (e) This section expires the day following the submission of the report required on January 15, 2026. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116L.98, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Workforce program net impact analysis. (a) By January 15, 2015, the commissioner must report to the committees of the house of representatives and the senate having jurisdiction over economic development and workforce policy and finance on the results of the net impact pilot project already underway as of the date of enactment of this section. (b) The commissioner shall contract with an independent entity to conduct an ongoing net impact analysis of the programs included in the net impact pilot project under paragraph (a), career pathways programs, and any other programs deemed appropriate by the commissioner. The net impact methodology used by the independent entity under this paragraph must be based on the methodology and evaluation design used in the net impact pilot project under paragraph (a). (c) By January 15, 2017, and every four years thereafter, the commissioner must report to the committees of the house of representatives and the senate having jurisdiction over economic development and workforce policy and finance the following information for each program subject to paragraph (b): (1) the net impact of workforce services on individual employment, earnings, and public benefit usage outcomes; and (2) a cost-benefit analysis for understanding the monetary impacts of workforce services from the participant and taxpayer points of view. The report under this paragraph must be made available to the public in an electronic format on the Department of Employment and Economic Development's website. (d) The department is authorized to create and maintain data-sharing agreements with other departments, including corrections, human services, and any other department that are necessary to complete the analysis. The department shall supply the information collected for use by the independent entity conducting net impact analysis pursuant to the data practices requirements under chapters 13, 13A, 13B, and 13C. new text begin (e) This subdivision expires the day following the submission of the report required on January 15, 2025. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 248.07, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Blind, vending deleted text begin stands and machinesdeleted text end new text begin facilitiesnew text end on governmental property; liability limited. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, for the rehabilitation of blind persons the commissioner shall have exclusive authority to establish and to operate vending deleted text begin stands and vending machinesdeleted text end new text begin facilitiesnew text end in all buildings and properties owned or rented exclusively by the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities at a state university, a community college, a consolidated community technical college, or a technical college served by the commissioner before January 1, 1996, or by any department or agency of the state of Minnesota except the Department of Natural Resources properties operated directly by the Division of State Parks and not subject to private leasing. Vending deleted text begin stands and machinesdeleted text end new text begin facilitiesnew text end authorized under this subdivision may dispense nonalcoholic beverages, food, candies, tobacco, souvenirs, notions, and related items and must be operated on the same basis as other vending deleted text begin standsdeleted text end new text begin facilitiesnew text end for the blind established and supervised by the commissioner under federal law. The commissioner shall waive this authority to displace any present private individual concessionaire in any state-owned or rented building or property who is operating under a contract with a specific renewal or termination date, until the renewal or termination date. With the consent of the governing body of a governmental subdivision of the state, the commissioner may establish and supervise vending deleted text begin stands and vending machinesdeleted text end new text begin facilitiesnew text end for the blind in any building or property exclusively owned or rented by the governmental subdivision. (b) The Department of Employment and Economic Development is not liable under chapter 176 for any injury sustained by a blind vendor's employee or agent. The Department of Employment and Economic Development, its officers, and its agents are not liable for the acts or omissions of a blind vendor or of a blind vendor's employee or agent that may result in the blind vendor's liability to third parties. The Department of Employment and Economic Development, its officers, and its agents are not liable for negligence based on any theory of liability for claims arising from the relationship created under this subdivision with the blind vendor. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 248.07, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Use of revolving fund, licenses for operation of vending deleted text begin standsdeleted text end new text begin facilitiesnew text end . (a) The revolving fund created by Laws 1947, chapter 535, section 5, is continued as provided in this subdivision and shall be known as the revolving fund for vocational rehabilitation of the blind. It shall be used for the purchase of equipment and supplies for establishing and operating of vending deleted text begin standsdeleted text end new text begin facilitiesnew text end by blind persons. All income, receipts, earnings, and federal vending deleted text begin machinedeleted text end new text begin facilitynew text end income due to the operation of vending deleted text begin standsdeleted text end new text begin facilitiesnew text end operated under this subdivision shall also be paid into the fund. All interest earned on money accrued in the fund must be credited to the fund by the commissioner of management and budget. All equipment, supplies, and expenses for setting up these deleted text begin standsdeleted text end new text begin facilitiesnew text end shall be paid for from the fund. (b) The commissioner is authorized to use the money available in the revolving fund that originated as operational charges to individuals licensed under this subdivision for the establishment, operation, and supervision of vending deleted text begin standsdeleted text end new text begin facilitiesnew text end by blind persons for the following purposes: (1) purchase, upkeep and replacement of equipment; (2) expenses incidental to the setting up of new deleted text begin standsdeleted text end new text begin facilitiesnew text end and improvement of old deleted text begin standsdeleted text end new text begin facilitiesnew text end ; (3) reimbursement under section 15.059 to individual blind vending operators for reasonable expenses incurred in attending supervisory meetings as called by the commissioner and other expenditures for management services consistent with federal law; and (4) purchase of fringe benefits for blind vending operators and their employees such as group health insurance, retirement program, vacation or sick leave assistance provided that the purchase of any fringe benefit is approved by a majority vote of blind vending operators licensed pursuant to this subdivision after the commissioner provides to each blind vending operator information on all matters relevant to the fringe benefits. "Majority vote" means a majority of blind vending operators voting. Fringe benefits shall be paid only from assessments of operators for specific benefits, gifts to the fund for fringe benefit purposes, and vending income which is not assignable to an individual deleted text begin standdeleted text end new text begin facilitynew text end . (c) Money originally deposited as merchandise and supplies repayments by individuals licensed under this subdivision may be expended for initial and replacement stocks of supplies and merchandise. Money originally deposited from vending income on federal property must be spent consistent with federal law. (d) All other deposits may be used for the purchase of general liability insurance or any other expense related to the operation and supervision of vending deleted text begin standsdeleted text end new text begin facilitiesnew text end . (e) The commissioner shall issue each license for the operation of a vending deleted text begin standdeleted text end new text begin facilitynew text end or vending machine for an indefinite period but may terminate any license in the manner provided. In granting licenses for new or vacated deleted text begin standsdeleted text end new text begin facilitiesnew text end preference on the basis of seniority of experience in operating deleted text begin standsdeleted text end new text begin facilitiesnew text end under the control of the commissioner shall be given to capable operators who are deemed competent to handle the enterprise under consideration. Application of this preference shall not prohibit the commissioner from selecting an operator from the community in which the deleted text begin standdeleted text end new text begin facilitynew text end is located.